Louisiana, session 2026, SB421.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:40(A), (B), (C), and (E) and 116 are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§40. Additional copies of records; purchase of equipment; funds available for
payment; copies of suit records
A. The several district clerks of court and ex officio recorders and registers
of conveyances and recorders of mortgages, throughout the state, are hereby
authorized at their option to make additional copies, by any means authorized by
R.S. 44:116, of every nature and kind in their custody by virtue of their various
official capacities as such clerks of court and ex officio recorders and registers of
conveyances and recorders of mortgages, filed or recorded in their offices prior to
July 29, 1964, and subsequent thereto.
B. Such District clerks of court and ex officio recorders and registers are
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 421 ENROLLED
hereby authorized to purchase the necessary equipment, software, and services for
converting records into an electronic record, photorecording, photocopying,
microfilming, or electronic imaging, to lease such equipment and software or to
contract with competent independent contractors, or both, according to the discretion
of the clerks of court and ex officio recorders and registers, to cause the records
described in this Section to be copied or converted and reproduced.
C. Each such clerk of court and ex officio recorder and register is hereby
authorized to defray the cost of equipment, software, or services for converting,
copying, reproducing, digitizing, storing, and retrieving the records described in this
Section out of any funds available in the clerk's salary fund.
* * *
E. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection A of this Section or any
other provision of law to the contrary, prior to destroying the original criminal
records and any other records of every nature and kind that are deemed permanent
under a record retention and disposal schedule adopted by the secretary of state and
the clerks of court in accordance with R.S. 44:410 and 411, the destruction of which
is authorized by R.S. 13:917, the several district clerks of court, including the clerks
of the Criminal or Civil District Courts for the parish of Orleans, shall make and
retain in their custody a copy of such records electronically on nonrewritable
magnetic, optical, or laser-type storage media, including but not limited to CD-ROM.
No cause of action for any claim shall exist against a clerk of court for any damage
or loss resulting from the destruction of an original record after proper preservation
of the record in accordance herewith. However, all records in suits affecting records
relating to immovable property, or adoption, interdiction, successions, trusts, or
emancipation created prior to 1922 shall be retained in their original form.
* * *
§116. Photostatic, photographic, microfilm, or other photographic or electronic
copies of records; indexes of conveyance and mortgage records;
disposition; evidentiary status; preservation
A. In all cases where the district clerks of court and ex officio recorders of
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 421 ENROLLED
the various parishes throughout the state, Orleans Parish excepted, are required by
law to make records of filings, documents, pleadings, and all other written
instruments, including indexes, and registers of the same, such records may be made
by any method of photorecording, photocopying, microfilming, or other
photographic method of reproduction or electronically on non-rewritable magnetic,
optical, or laser-type storage media, including but not limited to CD-ROM. However,
the film stock used in making photographic or microphotographic copies and the
processing of the copies shall comply with the standards of the American National
Standards Institute for permanent record photographic microcopying film and the
electronic media used shall comply with the standards of the International Standards
Organization for electronic storage of records reproduced or converted using any
photographic, microphotographic, or electronic digitizing process capable of
producing an unalterable and accessible representation of the original source
record provided the usage of these processes is not otherwise prohibited by law.
B. Whenever recordation by means of photorecording, photocopying,
microfilming, or other photographic method of reproduction is used or when
electronic recordation on non-rewritable magnetic, optical, or laser-type storage
media is used, any requirement expressed or implied in law for the above-mentioned
records, including indexes and registers of the same, to be maintained in a book or
bound volume shall be satisfied by the appropriate storage unit of microfilm or other
photographic method employed, or tape or disk; however, if a clerk of court elects
to record by means of microfilming or other photographic method of reproduction,
or electronically, he shall have copies of the films, tapes, or disks available for
inspection, examination, and copying under the provisions of R.S. 44:31 et seq., and
other applicable laws.
C. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsections A and B of this Section or
any other provision of law to the contrary, clerks of court and recorders may make
indexes of conveyance and mortgage records by any method of photorecording,
photocopying, microfilming, or other photographic method of reproduction or
electronically on non-rewritable magnetic, optical, or laser type storage media,
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 421 ENROLLED
including but not limited to CD-ROM; however, the standards described in
Subsection A of this Section shall apply.
D. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection B of this Section or any
other provision of law to the contrary, for For any record filed on or after January
1, 2005, with the exception of records of a graphic nature, including but not limited
to plats, maps, and photographs as related to the work of a Professional Land
Surveyor engaged in the "Practice of Land Surveying", as defined in R.S. 37:682, a
clerk of court may reproduce the record as provided in this Section and shall return
the original record to the indicated person and to the address shown on the first page
of the record, or if no such person and address is indicated, to any vendee or other
transferee whose name and address are stated in the instrument. The clerk of court
shall verify that the copy of the record is complete and legible prior to the return or
disposal of the original record.
E.C.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection B of this Section or
any other provision of law to the contrary, with With the exception of instruments
filed in the conveyance records, a clerk of court shall not be required to maintain an
the original record filed on or prior to December 31, 2004, provided that:
(a) The record has been preserved using one of the methods contained in this
Section.
(b) The original of the record has been transferred to the state archivist
pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 44:406 or R.S. 44:427.
(c) The original of the record is not of a graphic nature including but not
limited to plats, maps, and photographs as related to the work of a Professional Land
Surveyor engaged in the "Practice of Land Surveying", as defined in R.S. 37:682.
(2)(a) With the exception of instruments filed in the conveyance records on
or prior to December 31, 2004, a clerk of court may destroy any record provided for
in this Subsection or return it to the person who is indicated and to the address shown
on the first page of the record, or if no such person and address is indicated, to the
person who presented the record after the clerk of court has done all of the following:
(i) Received certification written approval from the state archivist that the
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 421 ENROLLED
to dispose of the records are not subject to in accordance with R.S. 44:406 or 411.
(ii) Preserved the record as provided in this Section.
(iii) Verified that the copy of the record is complete and legible.
(b) No cause of action for any claim shall exist against a clerk of court for
any damage or loss resulting from the return or destruction of an original record in
accordance with this Paragraph after receipt of the certification written approval
from the state archivist to dispose of the record and proper preservation of the
record in accordance with this Section.
(3) The Department of State shall not make or authenticate a copy or
reproduction of any original record it receives from a clerk of court pursuant to R.S.
44:406. Upon receipt of any request for service or any inquiry relating to such a
record, it shall forward the request or inquiry to the appropriate clerk of court who
shall render the necessary service and charge the appropriate fee, as provided for by
R.S. 13:841 or R.S. 13:844.
F.D.When a clerk of court certifies that a copy of a record preserved by him
using a method provided for in this Section is true and correct, the certified copy of
the record shall be received in evidence, if relevant, by any court or administrative
agency as prima facie proof of its contents.
G.E. All rules adopted by the Department of State relative to retention and
storage of records of public bodies shall apply to all records provided for in
Subsections D and E of this Section. In addition, each clerk of court shall maintain
a locally available backup copy of any record destroyed pursuant to Subsection E of
this Section.
H.F. For purposes of Subsections D, E, F, and G of this Section the term:
(1) "clerk Clerk of court" shall mean any parish district clerk of court, and
ex officio recorder the register of conveyances, recorder of mortgages, and
custodian of notarial records in the parish of Orleans.
(2) "Convert" shall mean to capture all information contained in the
source records, including all pages or parts from the source records to be
preserved in a manner which protects against unauthorized deletions, additions,
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 421 ENROLLED
or alterations and is accessible for the retention period applicable to the record.
(3) "Electronic digitizing process" shall mean the process of scanning
and capturing paper or other media formats into a digital format that is of
sufficient authenticity, reliability, usability, and integrity to serve in place of the
original source record.
Section 2. R.S. 44:118 is hereby repealed.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.